North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-03 Legislative Assembly
District 30 consists of those parts of the city of Bismarck, and Apple Creek, Hay Creek, Lincoln-Fort Rice, and Missouri Townships in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of the Missouri River intersects with the centerline of west bismarck expressway, then east on west bismarck expressway until its intersection with the east property line of the riverwood golf course, then south on the east property line of the riverwood golf course until its intersection with a straight line extended west from tucson avenue, then east on the extended line until its intersection with the centerline of south washington street, then south on south washington street until its intersection with the centerline of east burleigh avenue, then east on east burleigh avenue until its intersection with the centerline of south twelfth street, then north on south twelfth street until its intersection with the centerline of basin avenue, then east on basin avenue until its intersection with the centerline of airport road, then north and east on airport road until its intersection with the centerline of east broadway avenue, then west on east broadway avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north nineteenth street, then north on north nineteenth street and a straight line extended north from north nineteenth street until its intersection with the centerline of east boulevard avenue, then east on east boulevard avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north twenty-sixth street, then north on north twenty-sixth street until its intersection with the centerline of east divide avenue, then east on east divide avenue until its intersection with the centerline of east bismarck expressway, then north on east bismarck expressway until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east and north on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with a straight line extending north from brigade street, then south on the extended line until its intersection with the centerline of miriam avenue, then east on miriam avenue until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-second street northeast, then south on fifty-second street northeast until its intersection with the boundary of Apple Creek Township, then west and south on the boundary of Apple Creek Township until its intersection with a straight line extending south from cavalry drive, then south on the extended line until its intersection with the centerline of lincoln road, then east on lincoln road until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-second street southeast, then south on fifty-second street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of forty-eighth avenue southeast, then east on forty-eighth avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-sixth street southeast, then south on sixty-sixth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-sixth avenue southeast, then east on seventy-sixth avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-third street southeast, then south on ninety-third street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north, west, and east on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

District 31 consists of all of Grant County and Sioux County; Acme, Beery, Brittian, Campbell, Cannon Ball, Castle Rock, Central Hettinger, Chilton, Farina, Highland, Mott, Odessa, Solon, Steiner, and Walker Townships in Hettinger County; and that part of Morton County not contained in Districts 33, 34, and 36.

District 32 consists of those parts of the city of Bismarck and Lincoln-Fort Rice Township in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as west main avenue, intersects the centerline of the Missouri River, then east on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of rosser avenue, then east on rosser avenue until its intersection with the centerline of bell street, then north on bell street until its intersection with the centerline of west avenue c, then east on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of griffin street, then north on griffin street until its intersection with the centerline of tom o’leary trail, then east on tom o’leary trail until its intersection with the centerline of north washington street, then south on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of west avenue c, then east on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of first street, then south on first street until its intersection with the centerline of east broadway avenue, then east on east broadway avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north ninth street, then north on north ninth street until its intersection with the centerline of east avenue e, then east on east avenue e until its intersection with the centerline of north nineteenth street, then south on north nineteenth street until its intersection with the centerline of east broadway avenue, then east on east broadway avenue until its intersection with the centerline of airport road, then south on airport road until its intersection with the centerline of basin avenue, then west on basin avenue until its intersection with the centerline of south twelfth street, then south on south twelfth street until its intersection with the centerline of east burleigh avenue, then west on east burleigh avenue until its intersection with the centerline of south washington street, then north on south washington street until its intersection with a straight line extended west from tucson avenue, then west on the straight line until its intersection with the east property line of the riverwood golf course, then north on the east property line of the riverwood golf course until its intersection with the centerline of west bismarck expressway, then west on west bismarck expressway until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

District 33 consists of all of Oliver County; all of Mercer County except that portion within the Fort Berthold reservation; that part of the city of Mandan and East Morton Township in Morton County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of Morton County intersects the west boundary of East Morton Township, then east on the north boundary of Morton County until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then south and east on the Missouri River until its intersection with the centerline of a straight line extended east from old red trail, then west on the extended line until its intersection with the Mandan city limit, then north, west, and south on the Mandan city limit until its intersection with a straight line extending north from the east property line of union cemetery, then south on the extended straight line until its intersection with the north property line of union cemetery, then west on the north property line of union cemetery and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of old red trail, then west on old red trail until its intersection with the centerline of eighth avenue northwest, then north on eighth avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street northwest, then west on twenty-seventh street northwest until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth avenue northwest, then south on twelfth avenue northwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of old red trail, then west on old red trail until its intersection with the centerline of highland road, then north and west on highland road until its intersection with the Mandan city limit, then west and south on the Mandan city limit until its intersection with the centerline of old red trail, then west on old red trail until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth avenue, then south on twenty-fifth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the west boundary of East Morton Township, then north on the west boundary of East Morton Township to the point of beginning; and that part of Longfellow, South McLean, Underwood, and Victoria Townships in McLean County bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of the Missouri River intersects the north boundary of Underwood Township, then north and east on the boundary of Underwood Township until its intersection with the north boundary of Victoria Township, then east on the north boundary of Victoria Township until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, then south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the Washburn city limit, then north, east, and south on the Washburn city limit until its intersection with the centerline of ninth street southwest, then east on ninth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 41, then south on state highway 41 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-sixth street northeast, then west and south on twenty-sixth street northeast until its intersection with the south boundary of McLean County, then west on the south boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the Wilton city limit, then west, north, and south on the Wilton city limit until its intersection with the south boundary of McLean County, then west on the south boundary of McLean County until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

District 34 consists of that part of the city of Mandan and Mandan Unorganized Township in Morton County bound by a line commencing at a point where the Mandan city limit intersects a straight line extending west from the centerline of division street northwest, then east on the straight line and division street northwest until its intersection with the centerline of collins avenue, then north on collins avenue until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east and south on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of Mandan avenue, then south on Mandan avenue until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as memorial highway, then south and east on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then south on the Missouri River until its intersection with a straight line extending east from forty-seventh street, then west on the extended line and forty-seventh street until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 1806, then north on state highway 1806 until its intersection with the centerline of fort lincoln road, then north on fort lincoln road until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 1806, then north and west on state highway 1806 until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth street southeast, then west on nineteenth street southeast until its intersection with the Mandan city limit, then south, east, west, and north on the Mandan city limit until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street southeast, then east on twenty-seventh street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of fourteenth avenue, then south and east on fourteenth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of percheron drive, then south and west on percheron drive until its intersection with the centerline of buckskin road, then north and west on buckskin road until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue, then north on tenth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street, then west on twenty-seventh street and an extended straight line until it intersects with the Mandan city limit, then west and north on the Mandan city limit until it intersects with a straight line extending south from the centerline of ridge drive, then north on the extended line until it intersects with the centerline of lincoln court, then east on lincoln court until its intersection with the centerline of westview place, then north on westview place until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-third street southeast, then west on twenty-third street southeast until its intersection with a straight line extending south from the centerline of ridge drive, then north on the extended line and ridge drive until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth street southeast, then west on nineteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 6, then north on state highway 6 until its intersection with the centerline of sunny road, then west on sunny road and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of sixteenth avenue southwest, then north and east on the extended line and sixteenth avenue southwest until its intersection with the Mandan city limit, then north, east, and west on the Mandan city limit to the point of beginning.

District 35 consists of that part of the city of Bismarck in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of the Missouri River intersects the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of east bismarck expressway, then south on east bismarck expressway until its intersection with the centerline of east divide avenue, then west on east divide avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north twenty-sixth street, then south on north twenty-sixth street until its intersection with the centerline of east boulevard avenue, then west and south on east boulevard avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north nineteenth street, then south on north nineteenth street and a straight line extended south from north nineteenth street until its intersection with the centerline of east avenue e, then west on east avenue e until its intersection with the centerline of north ninth street, then south on north ninth street until its intersection with the centerline of east broadway avenue, then west on east broadway avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north first street, then north on north first street until its intersection with the centerline of west avenue c, then west on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of north washington street, then north on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of tom o’leary trail, then west on tom o’leary trail until its intersection with the centerline of griffin street, then south on griffin street until its intersection with the centerline of west avenue c, then west on west avenue c until its intersection with the centerline of bell street, then south on bell street until its intersection with the centerline of rosser avenue, then west on rosser avenue until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as west main avenue, then west on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the Missouri River to the point of beginning.

District 36 consists of all of West Morton Township in Morton County; that part of South Dunn Township in Dunn County not contained in Districts 26 and 39; that part of East Morton Township in Morton County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of county road 84 intersects with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of Sweet Briar Creek, then south on Sweet Briar Creek until its intersection with the centerline of old highway 10, then west on old highway 10 until its intersection with an extended straight line from the centerline of thirty-eighth avenue, then south on a straight line extended from thirty-eighth avenue, on thirty-eighth avenue, and on a straight line extended from thirty-eighth avenue until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of forty-first street, then west on a straight line extended from forty-first street and on forty-first street until its intersection with the centerline of county road 84, then north on county road 84 to the point of beginning; and those portions of the city of Dickinson and Dickinson North and East Stark Townships in Stark County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of one hundred seventh avenue southwest intersects with the centerline of thirtieth street southwest, then east on thirtieth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-third avenue southwest, then north on ninety-third avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-ninth street southwest, then east on twenty-ninth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-first avenue southwest, then north on ninety-first avenue southwest and on an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth street southwest, then east on twenty-eighth street southwest and on an extended straight line until its intersection with seventy-eighth avenue southwest, then south on seventy-eighth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth street southwest, then east on thirtieth street southwest until its intersection with the east boundary of Stark County, then south on the east boundary of Stark County until its intersection with the south boundary of Stark County, then west on the south boundary of Stark County until its intersection with the west boundary of East Stark Township, then north on the west boundary of East Stark Township until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth street southwest, then west on fortieth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue southeast, then north on tenth avenue southeast until its intersection with the centerline of twentieth street southeast, then west on twentieth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of sixth avenue southeast, then north on sixth avenue southeast until its intersection with the Dickinson city limit, then west and north on the Dickinson city limit until its intersection with the centerline of fifteenth street southeast, then east on fifteenth street southeast until its intersection with the centerline of southview avenue, then north on southview avenue until its intersection with the centerline of eighth street southwest, then west on eighth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of eighth avenue southwest, then north on eighth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of fifth street southwest, then west on fifth street southwest until its intersection with the Dickinson city limit, then north and west on the Dickinson city limit until its intersection with the centerline of state street, then north on state street until its intersection with the centerline of villard street, also identified as business interstate highway 94, then east on villard street until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue east, then north on tenth avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of fourteenth street east, then west on fourteenth street east until its intersection with the centerline of fourth avenue east, then north on fourth avenue east and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first street east, then west on twenty-first street east until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue west, then north on tenth avenue west until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-fourth street southwest, then east on thirty-fourth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 22, then north on state highway 22 until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third street southwest, then east on thirty-third street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred ninth avenue southwest, then north on one hundred ninth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-second street southwest, then east on thirty-second street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred eighth avenue southwest, then south on one hundred eighth avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-third street southwest, then east on thirty-third street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred seventh avenue southwest, then north on one hundred seventh avenue southwest to the point of beginning.

District 37 consists of that part of the city of Dickinson in Stark County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of thirty-fourth street southwest intersects the centerline of one hundred fourteenth avenue southwest, then east on thirty-fourth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue west, then south on tenth avenue west until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first street west, then east on twenty-first street west, also identified as twenty-first street east, until its intersection with the extended centerline of fourth avenue east, then south on the extended centerline of fourth avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of fourteenth street east, then east on fourteenth street east until its intersection with the centerline of tenth avenue east, then south on tenth avenue east until its intersection with the centerline of villard street, also identified as business interstate highway 94, then west on villard street until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth avenue west, then north on thirtieth avenue west and a straight line extending north until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred fourteenth avenue southwest, then north on one hundred fourteenth avenue southwest to the point of beginning.

District 38 consists of all of Afton, Burlington, Burt, Des Lacs, Foxholm, Kirkelie, Rolling Green, and St. Marys Townships in Ward County; and those parts of Afton, Eureka, Harrison, and Waterford Townships and those portions of the city of Minot in Ward County not contained in Districts 3, 5, and 40.

District 39 consists of all of Adams County, Bowman County, Billings County, Golden Valley County, and Slope County; all of Stark County except those portions contained in Districts 36 and 37; all of Hettinger County except that part contained in District 31; and that part of Dunn County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of South Dunn Township intersects with the centerline of one hundred twentieth avenue, then west on the north boundary of South Dunn Township until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth street southwest, then east on eighteenth street southwest and an extended straight line until its intersection with the east boundary of South Dunn Township, then south on the east boundary of South Dunn Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Knife River, then southwest on the Knife River until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first street southwest, then west on twenty-first street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of eighty-second avenue southwest, then south on eighty-second avenue southwest until its intersection with an extended centerline of twenty-fourth street southwest, then west on an extended centerline and on twenty-fourth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 8, then south on state highway 8 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth street southwest, then west on twenty-eighth street southwest until its intersection with an extended straight line from the centerline of ninety-first avenue southwest, then south on a straight line extended from ninety-first avenue southwest and on ninety-first avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-ninth street southwest, then west on twenty-ninth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of ninety-third avenue southwest, then south on ninety-third avenue southwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth street southwest, then west on thirtieth street southwest until its intersection with the centerline of one hundred twentieth avenue southwest, then north on one hundred twentieth avenue southwest to the point of beginning.

District 40 consists of all of Margaret, Maryland, McKinley, and Tatman Townships in Ward County, that part of Waterford Township and the Minot air force base bound by a line commencing at the point where the east boundary of Waterford Township intersects with the centerline of bomber boulevard, then northwest on bomber boulevard until its intersection with the centerline of peacekeeper place, then northeast on peacekeeper place until its intersection with the east boundary of Waterford Township, and then south on the east boundary of Waterford Township to the point of beginning; and those parts of Eureka, Harrison, and Nedrose Townships, and that part of the city of Minot bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of thirtieth street northwest intersects with the north boundary of Eureka Township, also identified as one hundred twenty-eighth avenue northwest, then east and south on the north boundary of Eureka Township until its intersection with the northwest corner of Nedrose Township, then east on the north boundary of Nedrose Township until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-seventh street northeast, then south on twenty-seventh street northeast until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of nineteenth avenue, then west on a straight line extended from nineteenth avenue and on nineteenth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of airport road, then west on airport road until its intersection with the centerline of nineteenth avenue, then west on nineteenth avenue until its intersection with the centerline of north broadway, also identified as United States highway 83, then south on north broadway until its intersection with the centerline of third avenue northwest until it becomes fourth avenue northwest, then west on fourth avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of sixteenth street northwest, then north on sixteenth street northwest until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-first avenue northwest, then west on twenty-first avenue northwest until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth street northwest, then north on thirtieth street northwest to the point of beginning.

District 41 consists of the cities of Frontier and Prairie Rose in Cass County and that part of the city of Fargo and Stanley Township in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of interstate highway 94 intersects the centerline of interstate highway 29, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then south on twenty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth avenue south, then east on twenty-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth street south, then south on eighteenth street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth avenue south, then west on thirtieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-second street south, then south on twenty-second street south until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-second avenue south, then west on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then south on twenty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of fifty-second avenue south, also identified as county road 6, then west on fifty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of prosperity way south, then south on prosperity way south and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of sixty-fourth avenue south, then west on sixty-fourth avenue south and an extended straight line until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with an extended line from the north boundary of Stanley Township, then west on the extended boundary of Stanley Township and on the north boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of forty-fifth street south, then north on forty-fifth street south until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then east on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the point of beginning.

District 42 consists of that part of the city of Grand Forks and Blooming, Brenna, Grand Forks, Mekinock, and Rye Townships in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of twenty-eighth street northeast intersects with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue northeast, then east on twenty-fourth avenue northeast until it intersects with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then south on interstate highway 29 until it intersects with the centerline of twelfth avenue northeast, then west on twelfth avenue northeast until it intersects with an extended straight line from the centerline of nineteenth street, then north on a straight line extended from nineteenth street and on nineteenth street until it intersects with the centerline of United States highway 2, also identified as eighteenth avenue, then west on United States highway 2 until it intersects with the centerline of twenty-eighth street northeast, then north on twenty-eighth street northeast to the point of beginning.

District 43 consists of that part of Grand Forks Township and that part of the city of Grand Forks in Grand Forks County bound by a line commencing at the intersection of the centerline of interstate highway 29 and the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then east on the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of south twentieth street, then south on south twentieth street until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fourth avenue south, then east on twenty-fourth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south seventeenth street, then south on south seventeenth street until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue south, then east on twenty-eighth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 81, then south on United States highway 81 until its intersection with the centerline of fortieth avenue south, then west on fortieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south columbia road, then north on south columbia road until its intersection with the centerline of thirty-second avenue south, then west on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then north on interstate highway 29 to the point of beginning.

District 44 consists of that part of the city of Fargo and Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of north university drive intersects the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then east on twenty-eighth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of broadway north, then north on broadway north until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then east on twenty-eighth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of elm street north, then south on elm street north until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-second avenue north, then east on an extended straight line from twenty-second avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south, west, and east on the Red River until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of tenth street north, then north on tenth street north until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then north and west on the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth street north, then north on twelfth street north until its intersection with the centerline of seventh avenue north, then west on seventh avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of the BNSF railway company right of way, then north and west on the BNSF railway company right of way until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth avenue north, then east on twelfth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of north university drive, then north on north university drive to the point of beginning.

District 45 consists of all of Berlin, Gardner, Harwood, Kinyon, Noble, and Wiser Townships and the cities of Harwood, North River, and Reile’s Acres in Cass County; and that portion of the cities of Fargo and West Fargo and Reed Township in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the north boundary of Reed Township intersects the west boundary of Reed Township, then west on the north boundary of Reed Township until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south and east on the Red River until its intersection with a straight line extending east from the centerline of twenty-second avenue north, then west on the straight line until its intersection with the centerline of elm street north, then north on elm street north until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then west on twenty-eighth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of broadway north, then south on broadway north until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-eighth avenue north, then west on twenty-eighth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of north university drive, then south on north university drive until its intersection with the centerline of twelfth avenue north, then west on twelfth avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 29, then south on interstate highway 29 until its intersection with the centerline of business interstate highway 94, also identified as main avenue, then west on business interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Sheyenne River, then north, east, and west on the Sheyenne River until its intersection with the centerline of state highway 10, then west on state highway 10 until its intersection with the west boundary of Reed Township, then north on the west boundary of Reed Township to the point of beginning.

District 46 consists of the city of Briarwood and that part of the city of Fargo and Stanley Township in Cass County bound by a line commencing at the point where the centerline of thirty-second avenue south intersects the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then east on thirty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-second avenue south, then north on twenty-second avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of thirtieth avenue south, then east on thirtieth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of eighteenth street south, then north on eighteenth street south until it intersects with the centerline of twenty-fifth avenue south, then east on twenty-fifth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of south university drive, then north on south university drive until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then east on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Red River, then south on the Red River until its intersection with the south boundary of Stanley Township, then west, south, east, and south on the boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-first avenue south, then east on seventy-first avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of chrisan boulevard, then south on chrisan boulevard until its intersection with the east boundary of Stanley Township, then south on the east boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-sixth avenue south, then east on seventy-sixth avenue south until its intersection with the centerline of eagle point drive south, then north on eagle point drive south until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-fifth avenue south, then west and north on seventy-fifth avenue south, also identified as sixteenth street south, until its intersection with the centerline of seventy-third avenue south, then west on seventy-third avenue south and an extended straight line until its intersection with the east boundary of Stanley Township, then north on the east boundary of Stanley Township until its intersection with an extended line from the centerline of prosperity way south, then north on the straight line extended from prosperity way south until its intersection with the centerline of county road 6, also identified as fifty-second avenue south, then east on county road 6 until its intersection with the centerline of twenty-fifth street south, then north on twenty-fifth street south to the point of beginning.

District 47 consists of that part of the city of Bismarck and Hay Creek Township in Burleigh County bound by a line commencing at a point where the centerline of the north segment of burnt creek loop intersects the centerline of river road, then south and east on river road until its intersection with a straight line extending west from the centerline of fifty-seventh avenue north, then east on the straight line and fifty-seventh avenue north until its intersection with the centerline of north washington street, then south on north washington street until its intersection with the centerline of forty-third avenue northeast, then west on forty-third avenue northeast until its intersection with the centerline of United States highway 83, also identified as state street, then south on United States highway 83 until its intersection with the centerline of interstate highway 94, then west on interstate highway 94 until its intersection with the centerline of the Missouri River, then north and west on the Missouri River until its intersection with a straight line extending west from the centerline of olive tree drive, then east on olive tree drive until its intersection with a straight line extending southwest from a point on the centerline of burnt creek loop that is east on an extended straight line from the centerline of magnolia drive, then north and east on burnt creek loop to the point of beginning.

Source:

S.L. 2021, 1st Sp. Sess. ch. 563, § 1, effective November 12, 2021.